Massachusetts, session 194th, H1051.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall
be established a commission known as the voluntary acquisition of flood risk properties
commission, which shall assess the advantages and disadvantages of voluntary acquisition of
flood risk properties and structures across the commonwealth, examine the feasibility of such a
program, and identify the components of such a program. The climate chief in the office of
climate innovation and resilience, the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, and the
director of the Massachusetts emergency management agency shall collectively implement and
oversee the commission’s work.
(b) The commission shall consist of the following members or their designee: the climate
chief in the office of climate innovation and resilience, who shall serve as co-chair, the secretary
of energy and environmental affairs, who shall serve as co-chair; the director of the
of 4

Massachusetts emergency management agency, who shall serve as co-chair; the secretary of the
executive office of housing and economic development; the director of the bureau of relocation;
the commissioner of the department of environmental protection; the director of coastal zone
management; the director of the division of ecological restoration; the director of the department
of conservation and recreation flood management program; the minority leader of the senate; the
minority leader of the house; and the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on
environment, natural resources and agriculture.
(c) The commission shall include ten (10) additional members appointed by the chair; 1
of whom shall be a representative of a statewide land conservation organization, 1 of whom shall
be a representative of a river protection organization, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a
statewide wildlife protection organization, 1 of whom shall be a representative of an
environmental justice organization, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a housing justice
organization, 1 of whom shall be a representative of an organization with expertise in
homeowner property and casualty insurance licensed in the commonwealth, 1 of whom shall be
a representative of an organization with expertise in mortgages, 1 of whom shall have academic
expertise in climate data and flooding, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a regional planning
agency in a flood risk area and 1 of whom shall be a professional engineer licensed in
Massachusetts. The members of the commission shall be appointed not later than 30 days after
the effective date of this act and shall serve until the completion of the report described in
paragraph (g).
(d) The chairs of the joint committee on public safety and homeland security, and the
chairs of the joint committee on housing, or their designees, shall be observers to the commission
and shall be invited to all meetings of the commission. As properties are identified, the
of 4

commission shall include as observers to its meetings about these specific structures, the state
representative, state senator, and the town/cities’ municipal chief, or their designees, who
represent the potentially affected areas, and shall extend invitations to all relevant meetings of
the commission involving their districts.
(e) The commission shall seek and use the best available climate data and models, and
sea level rise, tidal, coastal, riverine flooding data, and models, to present an understanding of
the current and future flood risk to inland and coastal property in the commonwealth.
(f) The commission shall examine and make recommendations regarding the feasibility
and establishment of a flood risk reduction program that focuses on the voluntary acquisition of
flood risk properties and structures, that ensures that structures would be demolished, and the
land would be permanently conserved and restored to serve as a natural buffer against future
storms and floods, and accessible to the public when safe. Such an analysis would also describe
the necessary components of such a program, including a process for, and the feasibility of,
relocating homeowners and/or tenants.
In determining the feasibility of such a program, the commission shall consider the
following: (i) creating program eligibility and whether it is restricted to residential property;
(ii) identifying program funding, including but not limited to the calculation of fair market value,
cost effectiveness, the availability of federal funding and flood insurance, and funding sources
for education, outreach, acquisition, demolition, restoration, and relocation; (iii) determining
priority acquisition areas (including clusters of flood-prone homes and neighborhoods); (iv)
identifying factors that affect program outcomes with regard to the sale of property and the
consensual and voluntary relocation of owners and tenants; (v) assessing disproportionate
of 4

impacts of floods and relocation on low-income homeowners and tenants; (vi) determining the
feasibility and affordability of voluntary and consensual relocation of homeowners and tenants;
(vii) describing criteria to select participating neighborhoods and communities, including
prioritization of low and moderate income property owners, environmental justice populations,
and unintended consequences of targeting such communities; (viii) recommending eligible
entities that could acquire and own conserved properties in flood risk areas; (ix) facilitating
safety and public access in flood risk areas; (x) assessing the opportunity for significant
environmental enhancement to public health, safety and welfare and fish and wildlife habitat;
(xi) identifying nature-based solutions to protect, restore, and create sustainable resilient natural
areas and outdoor recreation opportunities on acquired property; (xii) making recommendations
on how to offset community disruption resulting from said program while prioritizing
community preservation; and (xiii) assessing the potential benefits of such a program to
impacted communities and the Commonwealth.
(g) All meetings of the commission shall be open to the public. The commission shall
hold at least one public listening session with a remote participation option. The commission
shall convene its first meeting no later than September 1, 2025.
The commission shall file a report along with findings, recommendations, and
accompanying drafts of legislation necessary to carry those recommendations into effect, if any,
with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the joint committee on
environment, natural resources and agriculture, the joint committee on public safety and
homeland security, and the joint committee on housing, not later than June 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 shall take effect on July 5, 2025.
of 4